Maine, session 132, LD943.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3782-A, sub-§2, as repealed and replaced by PL 1993, c. 385,
§17, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3782-A, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Department to provide services. Beginning January 1, 2027, the department
shall deliver all employment, training and other services for program participants under
this chapter and may not contract with a public or private agency or individual to provide
program services, except for certain service delivery functions when necessary, including
job training and education, employment support, child care assistance and transportation
assistance.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3782-A, sub-§3, as repealed and replaced by PL 1993, c. 385,
§17, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §3782-A, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Annual reporting. By January 1st of each year, the department shall submit a
report to the Legislature detailing the staffing and participant outcomes of the program and
the challenges and successes of administering the program.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §3788, sub-§12, as amended by PL 2017, c. 407, Pt. A, §82, is
further amended to read:
12. Developing resources. To In order to assist in the development of job placement
opportunities, the department in its efforts to encourage job placement opportunities and
provide the services necessary to ensure self-support to recipients of TANF assistance, the
department may contract with public and private agencies to establish job placement
opportunities cooperation with the Department of Labor and other state agencies shall
explore the feasibility of developing a shared approach to technology to support access to
information talent banks, national job banks, Maine's job listings and any other job
opportunity listings, to facilitate linking program resources listings and to coordinate case
service providers.
In order to assist in the development of job placement opportunities, the department in
cooperation with the Department of Labor and other state agencies shall explore the
feasibility of developing a shared approach to technology to support access to information
talent banks, national job banks, Maine's job listings and any other job opportunity listings,
to facilitate linking program resources listings and to coordinate case service providers.
In addition, all public and private agencies are subject to the following requirements.
A. All agencies that receive funds from any state department or division must provide
at least one workforce-MaineServe opportunity for an ASPIRE-TANF participant.
B. All state agencies that provide funding for child care or transportation services must
require that recipients of TANF be given priority for those services.
C. All agencies that receive funds from any state agency for the treatment of substance
use disorder must require that recipients of TANF be given priority for those services.
Sec. 6. Transition. By December 31, 2026, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall replace program services of the Additional Support for People in Retraining
Page 1 - 132LR1180(01)

412 and Employment - Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, established in the
423 Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, chapter 1054-A, provided under contract by outside
434 public and private agencies and individuals with program services delivered by department
445 employees. Funds allocated under contract to outside public and private agencies and
456 individuals must be reallocated to support the hiring and training of department staff to
467 deliver program services under this Act.
Sec. 7. Effective date. Those sections of this Act that repeal the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 3782-A, subsections 2 and 3 and that enact Title 22, section
3782-A, subsection 2-A take effect January 1, 2027.